src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-nammadit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - nammadit: # Verb 'name'
     nammadit+V+Inf: nammadit

     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nammadav
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nammada
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [nammada, nammad]
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: nammadin
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: nammadähppen #, nammadehpen]    #check!
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: nammadeba
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nammadip
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nammadihppit
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nammadi

     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nammadiv
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nammadi
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nammadij
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: nammadijmen
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: nammadijden
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: nammadijga
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nammadijme
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nammadijde
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nammadin

     nammadit+V+Imprt+Sg2: nammade  
     nammadit+V+Imprt+Du2: nammadehten    #check!
     nammadit+V+Imprt+Pl2: nammadihttit   #check!

     nammadit+V+ConNeg: nammade
     nammadit+V+GerII: nammademin
     nammadit+V+PrfPrc: nammadam
#     nammadit+V+GerI: nammadittijn 
#     nammadit+V+Sup: nammaditjit
#     nammadit+V+Vabe: nammadak  
#     nammadit+V+VGen: nammada 
#     nammadit+V+PrsPrc: nammadäddje 
#     nammadit+V+Vsubst: nammadim

#     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg1: nammadittjav
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg2: nammadittja
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg3: nammaditj
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Du1: nammadittjin
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Du2: [nammadittjabiehten, nammadittjabähtten]
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Du3: nammadittjaba
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl1: nammadittjap
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl2: nammadittjabihtit
#     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl3: nammadittji
